For individuals
Nerva for
Irritable bowel syndrome
Claria for
Mental health
Relio for
Chronic back pain
Evia for
Menopause
Finito for
Smoking cessation
Matter: blog & articles
Find a clinician
Back
Learn about
Hypnotherapy
Nerva for
Irritable bowel syndrome
Evia for
Menopause
For clinicians
Clinicians Overview
Nerva for Clinicians
Finito for Clinicians
Evia for Clinicians
Claria for Clinicians
Clinician Resources
Refer Patients with Connect
Nerva for IBS Clinicians Course
For health plans
Research
labs
About
Learn about Mindset Health
Contact us
Careers
Media & press kit
For individuals
Understand the science behind hypnotherapy and how it can help you.
For clinicians
Refer our programs to your patients and track their progress remotely.
For organizations
Promote team wellness with evidence-based hypnotherapy
Research
Discover the research our hypnotherapy programs are built on
About
Understand our mission, read our manifesto, meet the team and join us.
Back
Clinicians Overview
Nerva for Clinicians
Finito for Clinicians
Evia for Clinicians
Claria for Clinicians
Clinician Resources
Open Connect
Nerva for IBS Clinicians Course
Back
Nerva for
Irritable bowel syndrome
Claria for
Mental health
Relio for
Chronic back pain
Evia for
Menopause
Finito for
Smoking cessation
Matter: blog & articles
Find a clinician
Back
Learn about Mindset Health
Contact us
Careers
Media & press kit
Finito Privacy Policy
‍
Mindset Health Pty Ltd (ABN: 11 617 368 957) (“we”) are committed to protecting and respecting your privacy. This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) (together with our Terms and any other documents referred to on it) sets out the basis on which any personal data we collect from you, or that you provide to us, will be processed by us and how you can get access to this information. If in doubt, the primary governing law of this policy is that of the state of Victoria, Australia.
1. Purpose of this Policy
Mindset Health provides you (the “User”) with access to the online and mobile services associated with Finito, including but not limited to, tryfinito.com and all associated subdomains (the “Website”), and the Finito mobile application (the “App”), collectively the “System”.
2. Processing your data
What is the purpose of our processing?
We process your data in order to provide a program of personalised tools for helping you change your smoking habits (and to support the delivery of that program).
What is our legal basis for processing?
We require consent from all users before processing their data. This consent can be withdrawn at any time.
What data do we collect?
Personal information
Personal Information or personal data or personal identifiable information (PII) means information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person who can be directly or indirectly identified by reference to an identifier.
We collect and use information like your name, email address, gender, country, city, state and age bracket to personalise the course and communicate with you. You're able to opt out of any external communications (i.e., email and push notifications) at any time.
Health information
We collect information about your IBS symptoms (including, but not limited to, self-reported symptoms or difficulties associated with diarrhoea, pain, constipation, wind, bloating, nausea, anxiety and stress) in order to personalise our program.
We may also collect general information about your mental and physical wellbeing in order to evaluate progress against your self-defined goals.
Electronic identifiers
We may collection information about the devices you use to access the System, including (but not limited to) IP address, mobile device UDID and IMEI numbers, operating system, browser type, and screen size. This information is used to provide you with customer support, for system administration, to tailor your experience of the System, to report aggregate information internally, and to assist communication (e.g., push notifications).
Cookies
We may store cookies (small text files managed by your web browser) on your computer in order to improve your experience with the System. Example uses of these cookies include: recognising you when you return to the System, maintaining data you've entered across multiple sessions, and storing information about your personal preferences.
You may refuse to accept cookies by changing the settings on your device to prevent cookies from being set. However, if you select this setting you may be unable to access certain parts of the System. Unless you have adjusted your browser setting so that it will refuse cookies, our system may issue cookies when you visit the System.
Non-identifiable information
Non-Personal Information means any information that does not reveal Your specific identity either directly or indirectly.
We may include your data in aggregated data sets shared with our research partners. In these sets, your data is not personally identifiable, and would be used for supporting generalised statements (e.g., "women ages 30-40 working improved their IBS symptoms by more than men"). If you'd like to opt out, please email
hello@mindsethealth.com
.
Usage Data
Information collected automatically through Mindset Health (or third-party services employed in Mindset Health), which can include: behavioural data (e.g. number of sessions you complete, what techniques you practice or how many times you practice the techniques), the IP addresses or domain names of the computers utilised by the Users who use Mindset Health, the URI addresses (Uniform Resource Identifier), the time of the request, the method utilised to submit the request to the server, the size of the file received in response, the numerical code indicating the status of the server's answer (successful outcome, error, etc.), the country of origin, the features of the browser and the operating system utilised by the User, the various time details per visit (e.g., the time spent on each page within the Application) and the details about the path followed within the Application with special reference to the sequence of pages visited, and other parameters about the device operating system and/or the User's IT environment.
3. Who has access to that data?
Mindset Health understands that your identifiable health information is private and personal and is dedicated to maintaining its confidentiality and integrity. As such, we will never sell or rent it, and we have policies, procedures, and other safeguards to help protect it from improper use and disclosure.
The following categories describe the ways in which we use your identifiable health information and the rare instances that require us to disclose it to persons and entities outside of Mindset Health. We have not listed every use or disclosure within the categories below, but all permitted uses and disclosures will fall within one of the following categories. In addition, there are some uses and disclosures that may require your specific authorisation.
Mindset Health does not disclose Personal Information to third parties for any purpose materially different from the purpose(s) for which it was originally collected.
Disclosure at your request
We may disclose information relating to your use of the System when requested by you. This disclosure at your request may require written authorisation by you.
Payment
We do not store credit card or customer details with any 3rd parties except trusted suppliers who help us deliver the services associated with the System and we are committed to ensuring that all suppliers meet our security and data protection standards.
Services and Operations
We may use and disclose your identifiable health information in connection with providing services, for our internal operations, which include administration, eligibility, planning, analytics and various activities that assess and improve the quality and cost effectiveness of the service that we deliver to you. Examples are using information about you to improve quality of the service, satisfaction surveys, de-identifying health information, customer services and internal training. To the extent you receive access to our Website and App through your employer or your health plan, our services may include supporting, and sharing information with, your employer’s wellness program, your health plan or third-party administrator or other similar programs. Possible information to be shared may include participation data (i.e. the fact that you used Finito), milestone data (e.g. number of sessions you complete or how many times you practice the techniques) to allow you to earn incentives and rewards (if those are offered as part of your wellness program), as well as data from your self-reported IBS-related symptoms.
Emails
We may receive a confirmation when you open an email from us, or click on a link in an email, if your computer supports this type of program. We use this confirmation to help us make emails more interesting and helpful. When you receive an email from us, you can opt out of receiving further emails by following the included instructions to unsubscribe. However, by opting out of further email communications after you sign up, you may limit program reminders and other valuable program content and components.
In-app Chat
We allow chat support messages within the Finito app and Website to support your interaction with, or completion of tasks relating to your use of the System. We may use your personal information and health information assist in these conversations. You can opt out by emailing us at
hello@mindsethealth.com
.
Reminders and notifications
We may use and disclose your identifiable health information to contact you as a reminder to interact with, or complete tasks relating to your use of the System. You may make changes to the format and frequency of these reminders, or cancel these reminders and/or notifications by logging into your Finito account in the App, and/or by accessing the native notification settings on your mobile device when using the App.
Third party service providers
There are some services provided in our organisation through third party services providers. Examples of third party services providers include accounting services, server hosting and email delivery providers, business associates, vendors and other business partners and reputable companies in the industry who subcontract to us or to those of your employer as our corporate customers, where permitted by law. We may disclose your identifiable health information to our third party services providers so that they can perform the job that is required of them. To protect your identifiable health information, we require appropriate contracts or written agreements be in place that safeguard your identifiable health information.
Third party medical professionals
With your explicit permission, we may share your identifiable health information with third party medical professionals nominated by you.
Threat to health or safety
We may use and disclose your identifiable health information when necessary to prevent a serious threat to your health and safety or the health and safety of the public or another person. Any disclosure, however, would only be to someone able to help prevent the threat.
As required by law
Certain laws permit or require certain uses and disclosures of identifiable health information for example, for public health activities, health oversight activities and law enforcement. In these instances, Mindset Health will only use or disclose your identifiable health information to the extent the law requires.
For research and publicity purposes
We may use de-identifying health information for internal and external research and publicity purposes. This may include publishing aggregate information about our users (for example, that women ages 30-40 with IBS improved their symptoms by 70%) in the context of providing public health information and conducting academic research. In certain instances, we may only provide such information with special waivers and permissions from you. You can opt out by emailing us at
hello@mindsethealth.com
.
Analytics
Some of the third-party services that we use to monitor and analyse web traffic to keep track of user behaviour include:
Google Analytics (
privacy policy
) – We use Google Analytics to help us better understand traffic (add, organic and paid) to and from our site and apps.
Facebook Analytics (
privacy policy
) – We use Facebook Analytics to help us better understand the traffic that comes from our Facebook and/or Facebook ads.
Amplitude (
privacy policy
) – We use Amplitude to analyse user behaviour in our site and apps.
Vero (
privacy policy
) – We use Vero to manage our email newsletter service and collect feedback from app users.
Segment (
privacy policy
) – Segment is a tag management service that helps track behavioural data for other third-party service providers.
Transfer of business assets
In the event that we sell or buy any business or assets, in which case we may disclose your personal data to the prospective seller or buyer of such business or assets. If Mindset Health or substantially all of its assets are acquired by a third party, personal data held by it about its customers will be one of the transferred assets. Mindset Health will ensure that information transferred to third parties will only be used in a way that is compliant with our privacy principles, and will remain liable in cases of onward transfers to third parties.
4. How do we store your data?
We store all your personal information on secure servers. In some cases, to ensure a fast user experience, we may store some data on your device.
Where you have chosen a password that enables you to access certain parts of our App, you are responsible for keeping this password confidential. We ask you not to share the password with anyone.
We do not store any credit or debit card information. Payments are processed via a third party payment provider that is fully compliant with Level 1 Payment Card Industry (PCI) data security standards. Any payment transactions are encrypted using SSL technology.
Once we have received your information from the app or website, we will use strict procedures and security features to try to prevent unauthorised access. We will take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that your data is treated securely and in accordance with this privacy policy. We also have procedures in place to deal with any suspected data security breach. We will notify you and any applicable regulator of a suspected data security breach where we are legally required to do so. Information you provide to us is stored in encrypted form on secure servers located in the US, which are owned and operated by Google Cloud Platform (GCP). GCP are industry leaders in the provision of hosting services and take security very seriously - you can find out more about their security policies and processes in their
Security Whitepapers
.
We may process some of your data with third parties to use their software platforms who have servers outside the US, UK or EEA to send communication emails to our users, but always in accordance with data protection law and subject to strict safeguards.
5. Your rights
Users of the System have certain specific rights with regard to their information.
Right to access
A user of the System has the right to view all personal information that Mindset Health has collected about them, as well as the disclosure of this data. In order to receive this data, please contact the
Security, Privacy, and Compliance Officer
. The first copy of this information is provided free of charge, and in a portable / common electronic form (e.g., CSV file).
Right to accuracy
A user of the System has the right to ensure that the data we have stored is accurate. In most cases, the system allows you to directly modify your own information. However, if there is incorrect data within our system that you are not able to change, please contact the
Security, Privacy, and Compliance Officer
and we will work directly with you to update this information.
Right to deletion
Subject to any exemptions provided by law, a user of the System has the right to request deletion of all data within the system. To request your data be deleted, please contact the
Security, Privacy, and Compliance Officer
. In most cases, this request will be completed within 30 days. If circumstances require a delay to this deletion, Mindset Health will notify you directly explaining the reason for the delay. Note also that in some cases, there may be a legal requirement to hold on to your data. Again, Mindset Health will notify you directly if this is the case.
Right to withdraw consent
A user of the System has the right to withdraw their consent at any time by contacting the
Security, Privacy, and Compliance Officer
. Please note that without consent to process your data, we will be unable to deliver the Finito program.
Right to notification of disclosure
In addition to the right to request disclosures of your data specified in the "right to access" above, we will notify you as required by law if there has been a breach of the security of your identifiable health information.
Concerns or complaints
If you believe that any of your rights with respect to your or others’ identifiable health information have been violated by us, our employees or agents, please communicate with the Mindset Health
Security, Privacy, and Compliance Officer
.
6. Amending this Policy
We reserve the right to revise this Policy without notification. Any changes or updates will be effective immediately upon posting to www.nixsmoking.com/privacy-policy or www.mindsethealth.com/legal/finito-privacy-policy. Your continued use of the System constitutes your agreement to abide by the Privacy Policy as changed. Under certain circumstances (for example, if we expand the ways in which we use your personal information beyond the uses stated in our Privacy Policy at the time of collection), we may also elect to notify you of changes or updates to our Privacy Policy by additional means, such as by sending you an email.
Questions relating to revisions to this Policy may be addressed to the
Security, Privacy, and Compliance Officer
.
7. Who can you contact?
Security, Privacy, and Compliance Officer
Mindset Health's Security, Privacy, and Compliance Officer (and Data Controller) can be reached at:
Alexander Naoumidis
Level 2, 620 Church Street, Cremorne VIC 3121
hello@mindsethealth.com
HIPAA
If we are subject to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (“HIPAA”), you may also contact the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. Under no circumstances will we take any retaliation against you for filing a complaint.
8. Effective Date
This Policy is effective as of June 1, 2022.
‍
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sub-policy 1
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php:
Facebook
Email or phone
Password
Forgot account?
Create new account
It looks like you were misusing this feature by going too fast. You’ve been temporarily blocked from using it.
Back
English (US)
Gaeilge
Polski
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help provide and improve content on
Meta Products
. We also use them to provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and to provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account.
Essential cookies: These cookies are required to use Meta Products and are necessary for our sites to work as intended.
Cookies from other companies: We use these cookies to show you ads off of Meta Products and to provide features like maps and videos on Meta Products. These cookies are optional.
You have control over the optional cookies we use. Learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choices at any time in our
Cookies Policy
.
About cookies
What are cookies?
Learn more
Why do we use cookies?
Learn more
What are Meta Products?
Learn more
Your cookie choices
Learn more
Cookies from other companies
We use cookies from
other companies
in order to show you ads off of our Products, and provide features like maps, payment services and video.
Choose cookies by category
How we use these cookies
If you allow these cookies
If you don't allow these cookies
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
More information about online advertising
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Sub-policy 2
https://help.amplitude.com/hc/en-us/articles/206533238-Data-Security-Privacy:
Your choice regarding cookies on this site
Cookie Preferences
Sharing your cookies helps us improve site functionality and optimize your experience.
Click Here
to read our cookie policy.
Manage Settings
Accept
Accept
Reject
Settings
documentation
Search
K
Get Started
Data
Analytics
Session Replay
Guides and Surveys
Experiment
Feature Experiment
Web Experiment
Admin
Developers
SDKs
APIs
Partners
FAQ
🤷‍♂️
Oops! There's no page here.
Try a search, or head
home
.
Need help?
Contact Support
Visit
Amplitude.com
Have a look at the Amplitude
Blog
Learn more at
Amplitude Academy
Terms of Service
Privacy Notice
Acceptable Use Policy
Legal
© 2025 Amplitude, Inc. All rights reserved. Amplitude is a registered trademark of Amplitude, Inc.
Sub-policy 3
https://www.getvero.com/privacy/:
Terms and policies
Terms of Service
Privacy Notice
Acceptable Use Policy
Report Abuse
Cookie Notice
GDPR Commitment
DSA Commitment
Third Party Sub-Processors
Security
Vulnerability Disclosure Program
Privacy Notice
Last updated:
16 May 2018
Effective date:
25 May 2018
Introduction
We at Vero Holdings Australia Pty Ltd and its group companies
            (collectively "Vero", "we", "us", and
            "ours") know that our users ("you,"
            "your") care about how your personal information is used
            and shared, and we take your privacy seriously. Please read the
            following to learn more about our Privacy Notice. Please note, this
            Notice only applies where Vero is the controller of your
            information. Where Vero is a processor, the controller (our
            Customer) is responsible for the collection and use of your data and
            their privacy notice will apply. In such circumstances you should
            refer to their Privacy Notice and direct any queries to the relevant
            Customer.
Quick Links
We recommend that you read this Notice in full to ensure you are
            fully informed. However, to make it easier for you to review those
            parts of this Notice which apply to you, we have divided up the
            document into the following sections:
Section 1. What does this Privacy Notice cover?
Section 2. Privacy for our Website
What information do we collect?
Section 3. Privacy for our Services
What information do we collect and how do we use it?
Section 4. General Information
Will Vero share any of the personal information it
                    receives?
Legal basis for processing information (EEA visitors
                    only)
Where we store your information
Is the personal information secure?
What personal information can I access?
What choices do I have?
Data retention and deletion
Changes to this Privacy Notice
Questions or concerns
Definitions
Website
means https://www.getvero.com.
Services
means the software product that Vero
              provides website operators and other individuals encompassing a
              variety of tools and resources (including some elements of our
              Website) to enable them to collect user and usage data and send
              email and other messages efficiently to consumers based on their
              behavior.
End User
means any of our Customers' customers.
End User Data
means data relating to our
              customers' customers.
Personal Information
means personally
              identifiable information as defined by applicable data protection
              laws, including where applicable, EU data protection law.
1. What does this Privacy Notice cover?
This Privacy Notice covers our treatment of personally identifiable
            information ("Personal Information") that we gather when
            you are accessing or using our Website (see section 2 ) and Personal
            information that we gather when you access or use our Services. For
            the purposes of this Privacy Notice, "Services" means the
            software product that Vero provides website operators and other
            individuals encompassing a variety of tools and resources (including
            some elements of our Website) to enable them to collect user and
            usage data and send email and other messages efficiently to
            consumers based on their behavior (see section 3 ). This Notice does
            not apply to the practices of companies that we do not own or
            control.
2. Privacy for our Website
This section describes how we collect and use information from users
            of and visitors to our Website.
2.1 What information do we collect?
We gather various types of Personal Information from our users and
            website visitors, as explained in 2.1a below. We may use this
            Personal Information to analyze how users interact with the Website
            and for other purposes set forth in this Privacy Notice.
a. Information you provide to us
Your Personal Information: we receive and store any information you
            knowingly provide to us. For example, we collect Personal
            Information such as your name and email address. You can choose not
            to provide us with certain information, but then you may not be able
            to register with us or to take advantage of some of our features. We
            may anonymize your Personal Information so that you cannot be
            individually identified.
b. Information collected automatically
Whenever you interact with our Website, we automatically receive and
            record information on our server logs from your browser including
            your IP address, browser version and type, "cookie"
            information, and the page you requested. Usage Data: When you visit
            the Website, whether as a Vero customer or a non-registered user
            just browsing, our servers automatically record information that
            your browser sends whenever you visit a website ("Log
            Data"). For example, Log Data may include information such as
            your computer's IP address, browser type or the webpage you were
            visiting before you came to our Website, pages of our Website that
            you visit, the time spent on those pages, information you search for
            on our Website, access times and dates, and other statistics. We use
            this information to monitor and analyze use of the Website and the
            Services and for the Website's technical administration, to increase
            our Website's functionality and user-friendliness, and to better
            tailor it to our visitors' needs. Cookies: "Cookies" are
            identifiers we transfer to your computer or mobile device that allow
            us to recognize your browser or mobile device and tell us how and
            when pages in our Website are visited by you. You may be able to
            change the preferences on your browser or mobile device to prevent
            or limit your computer or device's acceptance of cookies, but this
            may prevent you from taking advantage of some of our Website's
            features. If you click on a link to a third party website, such
            third party may also transmit cookies to you. This Privacy Notice
            does not cover the use of cookies by any third parties.
3. Privacy for our Services
This section describes how we collect and use information we receive
            when you use our Services.
3.1 What information do we collect and how do we use it?
We gather various types of Personal Information from our users, as
            explained more fully below. We may use this Personal Information to
            personalize and improve the Services, to allow our users to set up a
            user account and profile, to contact users, to fulfill your requests
            for the Services and as otherwise set forth in this Privacy Notice.
            We may share certain types of Personal Information with third
            parties (described in this Section and in Section 4.1 below).
a. Information you provide to us:
Your Personal Information: We receive and store any information you
            knowingly provide to us. For example, we collect Personal
            Information such as your name and email address. You can choose not
            to provide us with certain information, but then you may not be able
            to register with us or to take advantage of some of our features.
            Your Customers' Personal Information: In order to provide you with
            the Services, we also receive and store any information you choose
            to provide us with in respect to your customers ("End
            Users"). The End User information ("End User Data")
            we receive and store typically includes names and email addresses of
            your customers, but will consist of any information you choose to
            provide us with.
b. Information collected automatically:
Usage Data: we automatically collect certain data relating to the
            performance and configuration of our Service and our customers' and
            our customers' end users' consumption and use of, and interaction
            with, the Service ("Usage Data"). Usage Data is generally
            technical information or data obtained from APIs, product software
            or systems hosting the products and services, devices accessing
            these products and services and solutions and/or log files generated
            during such use but may also include information such as IP
            addresses (which may in some jurisdictions be considered personal
            information). Such Usage Data is used for Vero to maintain and
            operate the Service and separately, to analyze and improve the
            Service. Usage Data does not include any customer or end user
            content stored in the Service. End User Data: as part of our
            provision of the Services to you, if you install the API libraries
            and other software code provided by us on your website, we will also
            track and collect End User usage information on your website.
c. Information we obtain from third parties
We also use third parties to collect information relating to you
            using Clearbit, CRM and similar services. For more information on
            how we share information, please see section 4.1 below.
4. General Information
4.1 Will Vero share any of the personal information it
                receives?
We neither rent nor sell your or your End User Customers' Personal
            Information in personally identifiable form to anyone. We share such
            Personal Information in personally identifiable form with third
            parties as described below.
a. Trusted Third Parties:
We employ other companies and people to perform tasks on our behalf
            and need to share your information with them to provide the Services
            to you. Unless we tell you differently, such third parties do not
            have any right to use the Personal Information we share with them
            beyond what is necessary to assist us. This includes third party
            companies and individuals employed by us to facilitate our Services,
            including the provision of maintenance services, database
            management, web analytics and general improvement of the Services. A
            list of our current Trusted Third Parties can be found
here
.
b. Business transfers:
We may choose to buy or sell assets. In these types of transactions,
            customer information is typically one of the business assets that is
            transferred. Also, if we (or substantially all of our assets) are
            acquired, or if we go out of business, enter bankruptcy, or go
            through some other change of control, Personal Information would be
            one of the assets transferred to or acquired by a third party, in
            which case such party will use your Personal Information in line
            with this Privacy Notice.
c. Protection of Vero and others:
We reserve the right to access, read, preserve, and disclose any
            information that we reasonably believe is necessary to comply with
            law or a court order; enforce or apply our conditions of use and
            other agreements; or protect the rights, property, or safety of
            Vero, our employees, our users, or others. This includes exchanging
            information with other companies and organizations for fraud
            protection and credit risk reduction.
d. With your consent:
Except as set forth above, you will be notified when your Personal
            Information may be shared with third parties, and will be able to
            prevent the sharing of this information.
4.2 Legal basis for processing Personal Information (EEA
                visitors only)
If you are a visitor/customer located in the European Economic Area
            ("EEA"), Vero Holdings Australia Pty Ltd is the data
            controller of your Personal Information. Our legal basis for
            collecting and using the Personal Information described above will
            depend on the Personal Information concerned and the specific
            context in which we collect it. However, we will normally collect
            Personal Information only where we have your consent to do so, where
            we need the Personal Information to perform a contract with you, or
            where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not
            overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights
            and freedoms.  In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to
            collect Personal Information from you. If we ask you to provide
            Personal Information to comply with a legal requirement or to
            perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant
            time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal
            Information is mandatory or not (as well as the possible
            consequences if you do not provide your Personal Information).
            Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Information in
            reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of a third party), we
            will make clear to you at the relevant time what those legitimate
            interests are. For more information on the legal basis for
            processing your information please contact us at
dataprivacy@getvero.com
or through our Registered Agent in the European Union at
getvero@lionheartsquared.eu
.
4.3 Where we store your personal information
Vero has its headquarters and the majority of its operations in
            Australia.  If you interact with, join or share your data with Vero
            in any of the ways explained in this Privacy Notice then, if you are
            not also in Australia, your Personal Information may be transferred
            to, and processed in, countries other than the country in which you
            are resident. These countries may have data protection laws that are
            different to the laws of your country and, in some cases, may not be
            as protective. Specifically, our servers are located in the United
            States, and our group companies and service providers operate in the
            United States, Australia and Singapore. This means that when we
            collect your Personal Information we may process it in any of these
            countries. However, we have taken appropriate safeguards to require
            that Personal Information will remain protected in accordance with
            this Privacy Notice.
4.4 Is the personal information secure?
Your account is protected by a password for your privacy and
            security. You must prevent unauthorized access to your account and
            Personal Information by selecting and protecting your password
            appropriately and limiting access to your computer or device and
            browser by signing off after you have finished accessing your
            account. We use appropriate technical and organisational measures to
            protect the Personal Information that we collect and process. The
            measures we use are designed to provide a level of security
            appropriate to the risk of processing your Personal Information.
            Specific measures we use include encrypting Personal Information in
            transit and at rest, the implementation of an internal security
            policy and access control measures for all team members, the use of
            firewalls and other threat detection technologies, regular backups
            for data recovery. Whilst we endeavor to protect the privacy of your
            account and other Personal Information we hold in our records, we
            cannot guarantee complete security. The transmission of information
            via the Internet is not completely secure. Unauthorized entry or
            use, hardware or software failure, and other factors, may compromise
            the security of user information at any time. The Website may
            contain links to other sites. We are not responsible for the privacy
            policies and/or practices on other sites. When following a link to
            another site you should read that site's Privacy Notice.
4.5 What personal information can I access?
a. Non-EEA Privacy Rights
Through your account settings, you may access, and, in some cases,
            edit or delete the following information you've provided to us:
Name
Email address
Password
Billing address
The information you can view, update, and delete may change as the
            Website or Services change. If you have any questions about viewing
            or updating information we have on file about you, please contact us
            at support@getvero.com. Under California Civil Code Sections
            1798.83-1798.84, California residents are entitled to ask us for a
            notice identifying the categories of Personal Information which we
            share with our affiliates and/or third parties for marketing
            purposes, and providing contact information for such affiliates
            and/or third parties. If you are a California resident and would
            like a copy of this notice, please submit a written request to:
dataprivacy@getvero.com
.
b. EEA Privacy Rights
If you are a resident of the EEA you have the following data
            protection rights:
If you wish to
access, correct, update or request deletion
of
              your Personal Information, you can do so at any time.
You can
object to processing
of your Personal
              Information, ask us to
restrict processing
of
              your Personal Information or
request portability
of your Personal Information.
If we have collected and process your Personal Information with
              your consent, then you can
withdraw your consent
at any time. Withdrawing
              your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we
              conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing
              of your Personal Information conducted in reliance on lawful
              processing grounds other than consent.
You have the
right to complain
to a data
              protection authority about our collection and use of your Personal
              Information. Contact details for data protection authorities in
              the EEA are available
here
.
If you wish to exercise any of these rights or want further
            information please contact us via
dataprivacy@getvero.com
or through our Registered Agent in the European Union at
getvero@lionheartsquared.eu
.
4.6 What choices do I have?
You can always opt not to disclose information to us, but keep in
            mind some information may be needed to register with us or to take
            advantage of some of our special features. You may be able to add,
            update, or delete information as explained in Section 4.5 above.
            When you update information, however, we may maintain a copy of the
            unrevised information in our records. You may request deletion of
            your account by contacting us at support@getvero.com  Please note
            that some information may remain in our private records after your
            deletion of such information from your account. We may contact you,
            by email or other means; for example, we may communicate with you
            about your use of the Website or Services. If you do not want to
            receive email or other mail from us, please indicate your preference
            by adjusting the settings using our Preference Center.
4.7 Data retention and deletion
We retain Personal Information we collect from you where we have an
            ongoing legitimate business need to do so, (for example, to provide
            you with a service you have requested or to comply with applicable
            legal, tax or accounting requirements). When we have no ongoing
            legitimate business need to process your Personal Information, we
            will either delete or anonymise it or, if this is not possible (for
            example, because your Personal Information has been stored in backup
            archives, then we will securely store your Personal Information and
            isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible.
4.8 Changes to this Privacy Notice
We may amend this Privacy Notice from time to time. Use of
            information we collect now is subject to the Privacy Notice in
            effect at the time such information is used. If we make changes in
            the way we use Personal Information, we will notify you by posting
            an announcement on our Website or sending you an email.
4.9 Questions or concerns?
Contact us directly:
By email at
dataprivacy@getvero.com
By post using the details below:
Vero Holdings Australia Pty Ltd
Level 1, 251 Riley Street
Surry Hills, NSW, 2010
Australia
If you are based in the EU you can contact us through our Registered
            Agent:
By email at
getvero@lionheartsquared.eu
.
By post using the details below:
Lionheart Squared (Europe) Ltd (FAO - Vero)
2 Pembroke House, Upper Pembroke Street 28-32,
Dublin, D02 EK84, Republic of Ireland
×
Notice
We and selected third parties use cookies or similar technologies for technical purposes and, with your consent, for other purposes as specified in the
cookie policy
.
Use the “Accept” button or close this notice to consent.
Press again to continue 0/1
Learn more and customize
Accept
Sub-policy 4
https://segment.com/legal/privacy/:
Print this page
Customer and Partner Agreements
Terms of Service
Acceptable Use Policy
Service and Country Specific Requirements
Data Protection Addendum (DPA)
Security Overview
Service Level Agreements
Advisory Services Terms
Professional Services Terms
Twilio Marketplace Terms
Twilio Segment Customer Data Platform Destination Integration and Listing Terms
AI/ML Terms
European Electronic Communications Code Rights Waiver
Customer Name Changes and Assignments
Updates to Legal Terms and Conditions
Privacy
Data Privacy at Twilio
Privacy Notice
Binding Corporate Rules
Customer Proprietary Network Information (CPNI)
Sub-processors
GDPR
Customer Data Protection Addendum
Supplier Data Protection Addendum
Global Applicant Privacy Notice
Mobile Application Terms
Twilio Frontline End User App Terms
Twilio Authy App Terms
Supplier Agreements
Supplier Purchase Order Terms and Conditions
Country-Specific Terms
Supplier Data Protection Addendum
Supplier Code of Conduct
Intellectual Property
DMCA Policy
Trademark
Resources for Law Enforcement
Government Requests
Transparency Report
Civil Requests
Submit a request or subpoena
Code of Conduct & Ethics Hotline
Twilio Code of Conduct
Ethics and Whistleblower Hotline
Digital Promotions General Rules
Sweepstakes Rules
Customer Research and User Experience
Acknowledgement and Waiver
Legal Notices for Twilio's Web Site
Impressum (Germany)
Italy ALIAS Database Code of Conduct
Code of Conduct (Italy)
Twilio Privacy Notice
Last Updated
:
February 6, 2025
(View the prior version of our privacy notice
here
An icon of a outbound link arrow
)
Introduction
The Privacy program of Twilio Inc. and its
group companies
(‘Twilio’, ‘we’ or ‘our’) is built on our
Binding Corporate Rules
('BCRs'), which serve as our code of conduct that governs our global processing of personal data.
In order to provide products and services ('Services') to our customers and conduct our day-to-day business operations, including the operation of our websites, we collect, use and share, or otherwise process personal data about our customers, our customers’ authorized users ('end user') and their customers, our website visitors and business contacts.
Personal data
is any information that directly identifies you, such as your name and email address, or that indirectly identifies you, for example a phone number or device identifier.
The personal data we may collect and process about you varies depending on our relationship with you. We may have a direct relationship with you because you have set up an account or consented to receive marketing communications from us, or we may have an indirect relationship with you via your relationship with one of our customers; for example you may be their employee or their customer.
We take privacy, data protection and our legal obligations very seriously. We are committed to being transparent with you about how we use personal data. This Privacy Notice ('Notice') aims to describe our privacy practices in a clear, accessible and easy to understand way and to let you know how you can exercise your rights in relation to your data.
This Notice applies where Twilio processes personal data as a
data controller
, in connection with the Services we provide to our customers and the operation of our business, including our websites.  As a data controller, we determine the purpose (why) and means (how) of personal data processing and are ultimately responsible for the correct handling of your data, in accordance with applicable law.  This Notice describes our general privacy practices. Depending on how you interact with us or the specific services you use, additional privacy notices may apply. These supplemental notices will be provided to you at or before the time we collect your personal data. These supplemental notices should be read together with this Notice and are incorporated by reference.
This Notice
does not apply
to the Personal Data we process in relation to job applicants. This is covered by our
Global Applicant Privacy Notice
.
We also process personal data for most of our Services as a
data processor
. As a data processor, we process personal data related to our customers' employees, end users and customers on behalf of our customers to provide Services to them in accordance with their instructions. These instructions are set out in our customer agreements,
Data Protection Addendum
, service specific terms or through a customer's use or configuration of a product feature.  You should contact these organizations directly for information about how they process your personal data as a
data controller
and to exercise your rights in relation to that data.
Contents of our Privacy Notice
Personal Data We Process
How We Process Personal Data
How We Disclose Personal Data
International Data Transfers
How We Secure Personal Data
How Long We Retain Personal Data
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
How To Exercise Your Rights and Choices
How We Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
Children
Automated Decision-Making
How to Contact Us
Changes to Our Privacy Notice
Twilio Product Privacy
Personal Data We Process
The personal data we collect about you depends on your relationship with us and the purposes for which we process that personal data. The following describes the types of personal data that we collected and disclosed for a business purpose in the preceding 12 months.
Personal Data You Share With Us Directly
Contact Information -
When you sign up for a Twilio, Sendgrid or Segment account and use any of our Services, request product information, ask for a call from our sales team, or participate in events, we ask you to provide us with your name, company name, business address, phone number, email address and other contact information. We also ask you to create a password and name your account (or accounts, if you have more than one).
Customer Account Data -
We process certain personal data to manage our relationship with you and administer you or your company’s account. This includes purchase history, names or contact information of individuals authorized to manage the Twilio account on behalf of our customer to set up, access and manage billing. We also collect personal data required to administer use of your account and the Services, and information to allow us to verify your identity for Know Your Customer or other identity verification purposes.
Customer Content -
We receive and store the content of communications received from you or our customers and other personal data uploaded to the Services or generated for our customers’ use as part of the Services, which we may be authorized by you or our customer to use, where necessary for specific legitimate business purposes and in accordance with applicable law.
Marketing and Contact Preferences -
We use information about how you would like to be contacted and choices you have made to send you marketing communications.
Payment Information -
In connection with Services you pay for, we ask you to provide our payment processor with your payment method information like a credit card or your Paypal account and your billing address. Our payment processor, acting on our behalf, gathers this so we can bill you for your use of our Services. Our payment processor will share your billing address with Twilio for this purpose.
Personalization Details -
Some of our products, such as our short code service, may require you to complete an application form by providing details about your or your company’s  intended use of the product to determine eligibility for these products.
Professional Information -
The information we process about you with respect to your employment or profession, including company, job title, email address, phone number and online business networking profile.
Subscriber Records -
For some of our communications products, we may also obtain proof of identity from you or our customer that includes a proof of address, name, physical address, or other identification information. For example, to use our
Trust Hub
or to obtain a phone number in certain countries, local law may require us to have a physical service address on file for the individual who will be using that Twilio number, whether that’s you or our customer's end user.
Support and Feedback -
When you interact with us on our websites including through our AI chatbots (e.g. our Help Center Assistant), over the phone or via email, we process the phone number or email address that you use, the content of your interaction and the feedback you provide about our Services. You may also provide us with feedback about our Services in surveys and questionnaires. We will let you know when a call may be recorded, in accordance with applicable law.
Personal Data We Generate or Collect Automatically
Communications Usage Data -
When you or our customers use Twilio communications products, we collect electronic communications metadata, such as phone numbers and routing information, the source and destination of a communication, location of the device generated in the context of delivering the communication, date, time, duration and type of communication, status of the message, error data and traffic records.
Device Information and IP Addresses -
When you use our account portal, we collect your IP address and device information through tracking technologies like cookies, web beacons, pixels, and similar technologies. We also collect IP addresses when you make requests to our APIs and in our server logs. Additionally, we collect information about your device, such as your computer or mobile device operating system type and version number, manufacturer and model, browser type, screen resolution, unique identifiers, and general location information such as city or town when you use our account portal.
We do not collect precise geolocation information.
Online Activity Information -
When you visit Twilio websites, including our web forms, we use tracking technologies such as cookies, web beacons, and pixels to collect the following data: your device and browser, time zone setting, web pages visited, products you view or search for, page response times, download errors, length of visits to certain pages, page interaction information, IP address.
Security Identifiers or SIDs -
When you sign up for an account with Twilio, we’ll automatically assign you and each of your accounts a unique security ID and generate an API token for each account. We keep a record of these credentials so we know it is you making the requests when your application makes requests to our API using these credentials.
Customer Proprietary Network Information -
When you use certain US voice-based communications services, Twilio collects information associated with your service usage. This includes information such as the number of phone calls, call destinations, call locations, type, and service configuration, and is known as Customer Proprietary Network Information ('CPNI'). CPNI does not include information such as your name, address, phone number, or the content of phone calls. We use CPNI to market Twilio-related Services to which you are not already subscribed unless you have exercised your right to opt out. For information about your CPNI choices, see the section “
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
” below.
Personal Data Collected From Other Sources
Add-On Service Data -
In the event you purchase our Services through one of our
Add-On Partners
, they may share your personal data with us to fulfill their contractual obligations. Add-On Partners may share your personal data in the form of leads when you download Twilio content on the Add-On Partner’s website or you participate in events and webinars of which Twilio is a sponsor.
Professional Data -
We collect certain personal data such as employment or professional information from sources other than you. We may combine this data with other personal data that you share with us.
Publicly-Available Sources -
We may also use publicly-available information about you that we have gathered through services like LinkedIn, or we may obtain information about you or your company from third party providers, such as your industry, the size of your company, and your company’s website URL.
Social Media Data -
Social media service providers such as Google, LinkedIn, and Meta may provide us with information about you, in accordance with your privacy settings on those sites.
Telecommunication Data -
We receive communication-related data from telecommunications operators, aggregators and carriers that may include phone type, carrier history, SIM status and history, city and/or country where phone was first registered, contract and account type, IP address city and/or country and a validation result of personal data provided by our customer and whether it matches data held by the carrier.
How We Process Personal Data
The purposes for which we process personal depends on your relationship with us. We only use personal data that is necessary to fulfill the specified purposes listed below as applicable to you and in accordance with applicable data protection law.
Purpose
Personal Data Processed
Legal Basis for Processing
Creating and managing accounts, including verification of the identity of our customer’s end user for Know-Your-Customer (KYC) or identity verification purposes.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Online Activity Information
Payment Information
Professional Information
Subscriber Records
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Legal Obligation
Carrying out Twilio’s core business operations, such as account administration, accounting, auditing and compliance, business analytics, filing taxes, finance, forecasting, consolidated management and reporting, product strategy and revenue planning.
Add-On Service Data
Professional Information
Customer Account Data
Support and Feedback
Customer Content
Communications Usage Data
Payment Information
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Billing and relationship management.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Communications Usage Data
Payment Information
Legitimate Interest
Providing, optimizing and maintaining our Services and, platform, including debugging and troubleshooting.
Add-On Service Data
Subscriber Records
Online Activity Information
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Preventing, detecting and investigating security incidents and managing the security of Twilio’s platform, services, websites and accounts.
Add-On Service Data
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Online Activity Information
Payment Information
Subscriber Records
Telecommunication Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Legal Obligation
Preventing, detecting, or investigating abuse or misuse of Twilio’s platform or Services , including spam, fraud, illegal activities, or violations of the
Twilio Acceptable Use Policy
,
or assisting telecommunications service providers, regulators, or law enforcement agencies with combating spam, fraud, or illegal activities.
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Customer Account Data
Contact Information
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Telecommunications Data
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Legal Obligation
Determining eligibility for certain Services.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Payment Information
Personalization Details
Subscriber Records
Legitimate Interest
For routing and connectivity purposes to send messages on behalf of our customers, including transmitting, distributing and exchanging communications using phone numbers, either through the public switched telephone network or other communications networks.
Add-On Service Data
Communications Usage Data
Legitimate Interest
Providing customer support, including responding to your requests and communicating with you about your account and use of the services, including suspicious activity or security alerts.
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Customer Content
Communications Usage Data
Professional Information
Support and Feedback
Security Identifier
Other personal data provided by requestor
Legitimate interest
Sending important notifications about our Services.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Legitimate Interest
Complying with legal and regulatory obligations, telecommunication service provider requirements and communications industry codes of practice.
Subscriber Records
Customer Content
Communications Usage Data
Customer Account Data
Legitimate Interest
Sending marketing communications in accordance with your marketing preferences.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Analyzing your interest in our Services and delivering marketing campaigns that are relevant to you.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Deploying cookies and other tracking technologies in accordance with your online settings.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Understanding how visitors navigate our websites, and tracking and optimizing the performance of our advertising activities.
Device Information
Online Activity Information
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Understanding how customers are using our platform and improving the website navigation experience.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Online Activity Information
Professional Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Conducting questionnaires and surveys to improve our Services and provide training to our employees.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Personalization Details
Professional Data
Support and Feedback
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Managing your participation in our events and webinars and granting you access to whitepapers and on-demand resources.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Support and Feedback
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Collecting sales insights and performing lead scoring.
Contact Information
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Developing our business by updating, expanding, and analyzing our customer relationship records.
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Payment Information
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Identifying potential job candidates.
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Developing or improving our Services, including anonymizing, de-identifying, pseudonymizing and aggregating personal data for this purpose.
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Customer Account Data
Personalization Details
Support and Feedback
Legitimate Interest
As otherwise authorized by you or our customer in Service specific terms or through your or our customer’s use and configuration of features in a product.
Data used will vary based on customer authorization
Legitimate Interest
Protecting the health and safety of our employees, visitors and our properties.
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Legal Obligation
Protecting the rights and freedoms of individuals, meeting legal or regulatory obligations, including complying with valid court orders, disclosure requests, subpoenas, and other appropriate legal mechanisms.
Add-On Service Data
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Online Activity Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Payment Information
Subscriber Records
Telecommunication Data
Security Identifier
Legal Obligation
Legitimate Interest
How We Disclose Personal Data
We disclose personal data to third parties in limited circumstances in order to provide the Services and to otherwise run our business. Below are the different scenarios under which we may disclose your data to third parties.
Telecommunications Service Providers
Twilio’s communications products provide an easier way for developers to build applications that make use of the publicly switched telephone network ('PSTN') to send communications. Therefore, we engage with a global network of telecommunications operators, aggregators, carriers and other communication service providers (collectively, “telecommunications service providers”) as necessary to route and connect those communications from the sender to the intended recipient. How telecommunications service providers handle this data is generally determined by their own policies and local regulations.
Where telecommunications service providers transmit the content of a communication, they function neither as data controllers nor data processors, instead they act simply as a conduit to transmit communication content. In the event telecommunications services providers process any personal data for their own purposes such as communications metadata required to transmit the message, or for billing or fraud prevention purposes, they also act as data controllers.
We may have to share Subscriber Records with local government authorities or local telecommunications carriers that provide connectivity services. However, we don’t share subscriber records for purposes other than this, and we treat these records with our highest confidentiality.
Other Communications Service Providers
For proper routing and connectivity, Twilio also enables sending or receiving communications through communications service providers that do not use the PSTN, these are referred to as Over-the-Top ('OTT') communications service providers. If you or our customer chooses to use Twilio to send or receive communications by way of these providers, Twilio will disclose communications content and other data to these providers as necessary to route and connect those communications from the sender to the intended recipient. How those OTT communications service providers, as data controllers, handle this data is determined by their own policies and local regulations.
Third Party Service Providers
Twilio engages third-party vendors and service providers to carry out certain personal data processing functions on our behalf. These providers are limited to only accessing or using personal data to provide services to us and must provide reasonable assurances they will appropriately safeguard the data.
Add-On Partners
Add-ons are additional features, functionality or services offered by Twilio’s Add-on partners (who are third parties not affiliated with Twilio). Twilio may make Add-ons available through the Twilio Marketplace. Some Add-ons may need to access or collect some of your information, including personal data. If you choose to use an Add-on, Twilio will disclose your information to the Add-on partner so you can use the Add-on. Twilio does not control Add-on partners’ use of your information and their use of your information will be in accordance with their own policies. If you do not want your information to be disclosed to an Add-on partner, then you should not use the Add-on.
Twilio Group Members
We may disclose your personal data among Twilio Group Members. Twilio Group Members will only use the information as described in this Notice. Twilio Group Members are listed in Appendix 1 in our
Binding Corporate Rules
.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
We may disclose your personal data to a third party if:
If we reasonably believe that disclosure is compelled by applicable law, regulation, legal process, or a government request (including to meet national security, emergency services, or law enforcement requirements);
to enforce our agreements and policies;
to protect the security or integrity of our Services;
to protect ourselves, our other customers, or the public from harm or illegal activities, including security threats, spam and fraud; or
to respond to an emergency which we believe in good faith requires us to disclose data to assist in preventing a death or serious bodily injury.
For more details, please see the procedure laid out in our
Binding Corporate Rules
.
If Twilio is required by law to disclose any personal data about you, we will notify you or our customers of the disclosure requirement to the extent legally permitted and where Twilio determines such disclosure will not interfere with an ongoing investigation. Further, we object to information requests we do not believe were issued properly.
Business Transfers
In connection with a corporate sale, merger, reorganization, dissolution or similar event, personal data about you may be part of the assets transferred or disclosed in connection with the due diligence for any such transaction. If required by law, we will notify you prior to such a transfer and provide you with information about any choices you may have with respect to your personal data.
Aggregated, Anonymized or De-identified Data
Aggregated, anonymized and de-identified data may be derived by Twilio from your personal data but is generally not considered personal data under data protection law as this data does not directly or indirectly reveal your identity. We may use and disclose de-identified, anonymized or aggregated data to third parties. We do not disaggregate or reidentify de-identified data.
International Data Transfers
As a global organization, we may need to transfer your personal data to Twilio affiliates, contractors, service providers and third parties in various countries and jurisdictions around the world. When we transfer your personal data, we take care to use appropriate safeguards to ensure your personal data remains protected.
Data Transfers to the United States and Elsewhere
When you use our account portal, or our other Services, your personal data may be transferred to the United States, where our primary processing facilities are located, and possibly to other countries where we or our service providers operate.
Safeguards for Data Transfers
Twilio employs appropriate safeguards for cross-border transfers of personal data, as required by applicable local law.
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF“)
As set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce Twilio is officially certified under the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and Swiss-U.S. DPF and relies on these certifications as its primary transfer mechanisms for transfers of personal data from the EU and Switzerland to the U.S. Twilio adheres to the DPF principles for onward transfers of personal data to third parties and remains liable for damages caused by third parties under the DPF unless Twilio did not cause the event giving rise to damage. The U.S. Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Twilio’s compliance with the DPF. To learn more about the DPF Program, and to view our certifications, please visit the
DPF website
.
Twilio’s Binding Corporate Rules
Twilio has established and implemented a set of
Binding Corporate Rules
for internal transfers of personal data between Twilio Group Members in the European Union and Twilio Group Members elsewhere as a data controller. Twilio’s BCRs have been approved by European Union Data Protection Authorities and are a commitment by Twilio to adequately protect personal data that Twilio processes regardless of where the information resides. You can access Twilio’s BCR-Controller Policy
here
.
Where neither the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, Swiss-EU DPF nor Twilio's BCRs apply, we rely instead on other data transfer mechanisms to transfer personal data outside the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland, such as Standard Contractual Clauses and the UK’s International Data Transfer Agreement.
APEC CBPR & PRP Participation
Twilio’s privacy practices, described in this Notice, comply with the APEC Cross Border Privacy Rules (“CBPR”) and Privacy Recognition for Processors (“PRP”) Systems. The APEC, CBPR and PRP systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating APEC economies. More information about the APEC framework can be found
here
.
How We Secure Personal Data
To protect personal data from loss, or unauthorized use, access or disclosure, Twilio uses reasonable and appropriate security measures designed to protect the security of your personal data both online and offline. These measures vary based on the sensitivity of the personal data we collect, process and store and the current state of technology.  All systems used to support our business are governed by Twilio’s Information Security Policy and Standards which are built on industry standards and best practices such as the ISO 27001 and NIST standards. More information about our security measures can be found in our
Security Overview
.
How Long We Retain Personal Data
We endeavor not to retain personal data in a form which permits identification of individuals for longer than is necessary for the purposes for which that data is processed. We retain personal data in accordance with Twilio's record retention policies and guidelines as revised and updated from time to time.
Twilio will store your Customer Account Data as long as needed to provide you or our customer with the Services and to operate our business. If you ask Twilio to delete specific personal data from your Customer Account Data (see ‘
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
’ below), we will honor this request, unless deleting that information prevents us from carrying out necessary business functions, such as billing for our services, calculating taxes, or conducting required audits.
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
Depending on the data protection laws applicable to you, you may have the following rights in relation to your personal data that we process as a data controller:
that we provide details about the categories of personal data that we collect about you, including how we collect and share it;
that we provide you access to, and a copy of, the personal data we collect about you;
that we update or correct any inaccurate personal data we have about you;
that we delete the personal data we have about you;
that we restrict processing of personal data about you;
that we provide you with your personal data in a structured, commonly used format and to transmit that information to another controller, and where feasible, transmit the information directly;
that we provide you with the right to object to the processing of personal data, including profiling;
that we provide you with a free, easy mechanism to object to use of your personal information for direct marketing purposes;
that you not be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, that produces legal effects or similarly affects your individual rights;
to withdraw your consent; and
to complain to a competent supervisory authority and/or to commence proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction.
Twilio will honor your rights subject to limitations in certain situations, such as where Twilio can demonstrate that it has a legal requirement or legitimate interest to process your data or can legitimately apply an exemption to the exercise of a right under applicable law. More information about these rights can be found in our Binding Corporate Rules Controller Policy
Rule 10
and
Appendix 3
.
If you are a
US resident
interested in what personal data we have disclosed lately for our business purposes, here’s a list:
Identifiers
Commercial information
Financial information
Internet or other electronic activity information
Geolocation information
Professional or employment information
By “our business purposes,” we mean that we only disclose personal data as we describe in the section "
How We Disclose Personal Data
" above.  Also, as described in the “How We Use Cookies & Other Tracking technologies” section below, we process personal data to deliver ads targeted to your interests on other companies’ websites and mobile apps. Some of these activities may be considered “sharing” or “targeted advertising” under certain laws. You have the right to opt out of the processing of your personal data for targeted advertising, and can do so by adjusting your preferences using our Cookie Preferences Tool located on the bottom right of the Twilio website you are visiting. Any choices concerning cookies are browser and/or device specific. If you clear your cookies from your browser on any of your devices, your choices will need to be reset.
You also have the right to request the restriction of processing of your sensitive personal information. Where applicable, the respective sensitive personal information will be marked accordingly and may only be processed by us for certain purposes. At the current time, however, we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than those expressed in this Privacy Notice or otherwise permitted by applicable law, and these uses cannot be limited under California law.
You may have additional rights under our
Binding Corporate Rules
in the EU. For example, where you believe your personal data has been transferred by an EU-based Twilio company to our US headquarters and processed by the US company in breach of the Binding Corporate Rules, you may have a right to:
Lodge a complaint with the Twilio company that transferred your data outside Europe;
Lodge a complaint with the supervisory authority in the same country as the Twilio company that transferred your data outside Europe; and
Bring a court action against the Twilio company that transferred your data outside Europe.
If Twilio processes your personal data as a data processor on behalf of a customer, we will either direct you to contact our customer to exercise your rights.
How To Exercise Your Rights and Choices
The following sections provide information about how to exercise certain rights in relation to your personal data. To exercise any other rights, please contact us at
privacy@twilio.com
.
Accessing and Controlling Account Data
As part of our Services, we provide you with a number of self-service features at no additional cost within the Twilio console itself, including the ability to access your data, update any incorrect data, download a copy of your data, delete your data, or restrict the use of your data. You can make various choices about your Customer Account Data through the account portal when you log into your Twilio account or through the marketing preferences center. Any other requests about your data you cannot make through these self-service tools, you can request by contacting
Customer Support
.
Closing Your Account and Deletion
To request closure or deletion of your Twilio account, you can contact
Customer Support
. Please be aware that closure or deletion of your Twilio account will result in you permanently losing access to your account and the data in the account. After closure of your account, certain information associated with your account may remain on Twilio’s servers in an aggregated form that does not identify you. Similarly, after you close your account, we will retain data — including personal data — associated with your account that we are required to maintain for legal purposes or for necessary business operations (see “
How Long We Retain Personal  Data
” section above) until it’s no longer needed.
Identity Verification
In some instances, we will need to verify your identity before honoring your request. We will generally verify your identity by asking you to provide personal data related to your recent interactions with us. Thereafter, we will process your request and inform you of any decisions we have made about your request.  Additionally, you may exercise your privacy rights through an authorized agent. If we receive your request from an authorized agent, we may ask for evidence that you have provided such agent with a power of attorney or that the agent otherwise has valid written authority to submit requests to exercise rights on your behalf. If you are an authorized agent seeking to make a request, please contact us at
privacy@twilio.com
.
We won’t discriminate against you or change the price of our services if you make a request, but if you ask us to delete your data, it may affect your ability to use our Services.
Customer Proprietary Network Information (CPNI)
As an individual Twilio account holder or as an authorized representative of a Twilio customer in the US, you have the right to restrict Twilio’s use of
CPNI
. To opt-out of the use of CPNI data related to your Twilio account to market other Twilio Services based on your usage of our Services, click
here
.  Please note that, if you have subscribed for the services on behalf of an organization, the CPNI relates to the service usage by that organization and not you individually. Opting-out of the use of CPNI for marketing will not unsubscribe you from other types of marketing contacts from Twilio and will not affect the status of the services you currently have with us. Your approval or opt-out of the use of your CPNI outside of the services to which you are already subscribed is valid until you affirmatively revoke or limit such approval.
Communication Preferences
You can opt out of receiving marketing communications from us at any time through your marketing preferences page by clicking the “unsubscribe” link at the bottom of any marketing email you receive from Twilio. You can also
update your communication preferences
using our online form or contact our
Customer Support
Team to communicate your choice to opt out. Please note that it may take up to three days to remove your contact information from our marketing communications lists, so you may receive correspondence from us for a short time after you make your request. You will not be able to opt out of service emails from us, such as password reset emails, billing emails, or notifications of updates to our terms, unless you deactivate your account.
How We Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
Twilio uses common information gathering tools such as cookies, web beacons, pixels and other similar tracking technologies to automatically collect information as you navigate our websites, your account or when you interact with emails we send to you.
Cookies
A cookie is a small text file that is stored in your browser or elsewhere on your hard drive. Cookies allow Twilio to identify your device as you navigate our websites or your account. This makes navigating and interacting with our websites or your account more efficient, easy and meaningful for you.
Twilio uses both session and persistent cookies. Session cookies are cookies that disappear from your computer or browser when you turn off your computer. Persistent cookies stay on your computer even after you’ve turned it off.
The cookies on our websites fall into three categories: (1) Required Cookies, (2) Functional Cookies, and (3) Advertising Cookies. To learn more about each category of cookie, you can visit our cookie consent tool by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” link on the bottom right of the Twilio website you are visiting.
Manage Your Cookie Preferences
Twilio uses a cookie consent tool, which you can utilize to customize your cookie preferences. When you visit our website for the first time, a cookie consent banner will pop up and ask you to customize your cookie preferences. If you decide to change your preferences at a later date, you can easily do so by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” link on the bottom right of the Twilio website you are visiting. Please note that Required Cookies cannot be disabled and if you decide to opt-out of Functional Cookies, certain functionality of our websites or your account may be impacted.  Any choices concerning cookies are browser and/or device specific. If you clear your cookies from your browser on any of your devices, your choices will need to be reset.
Manage Cookies Using Your Browser
In addition to using our Cookie Consent tool, you can use your browser settings to opt out of Functional Cookies and Advertising Cookies. For more information on how to do that, click
here
. To manage privacy and storage settings for cookies, click
here
.
Universal Opt-Out Mechanisms
Global Privacy Control (GPC) and Do Not Track (DNT) are tools that you can use to inform websites of your privacy preferences in regard to ad trackers. To set up GPC, you can visit the
Global Privacy Control
page. To set DNT, you can visit the
All About DNT
page. Please note that this may impact the functionality of our websites or your account.
Opt Out of Advertising Cookies
To learn more about how to opt out of targeting and advertising cookies, you can go to the
Your Online Choices
page, the
Network Advertising Initiative
page, and the
Digital Advertising Alliance’s Consumer Choice
page. These opt-out tools are provided by third parties, not Twilio. We do not control or operate these tools or the choices that advertisers and others provide through these tools.
Web Beacons
Twilio also uses web beacons to gather data about your use of our websites, your account, and how you interact with emails we have sent to you. Web beacons are clear electronic images that can recognize certain types of data on your computer, like when you view a particular website tied to the web beacon, and a description of a website tied to the web beacon. Additionally, we may put web beacons in marketing emails that notify us when you click on a link in the email that directs you to a Twilio website.
Children
Our Services are not directed to or intended to be used by children (under the age of 13 in the US and UK, or 16 in the EEA). We do not knowingly permit children to sign up for a Twilio account. If we become aware that a child has signed up for an account, we will take reasonable steps to deactivate the account and remove their personal data from our records as quickly as possible. If you believe an underage person has signed up for a Twilio account, please contact us at
privacy@twilio.com
with the subject line “Children”.
Automated Decision Making
Automated decision-making occurs when an electronic system uses personal data to make a decision about you, without human involvement. Twilio uses automated decision-making leveraging a variety of signals derived from records we collect or obtain from third party vendors, to help monitor, identify, and suspend accounts sending spam or engaging in other abusive or fraudulent activity.  We may also use this information to evaluate your account application and make decisions about whether to approve or decline. If your account is suspended or not approved under these circumstances you will be notified and given an opportunity to request human review of the decision.
We may rely on other automated decision-making where:
We have notified you of the decision and provided you with the opportunity to request a human review of the decision
It is necessary to perform a contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
We have your consent and we have put in place appropriate measures to safeguard your rights
How to Contact Us
If you have any questions, concerns or complaints about this Notice or our data protection practices, please do not hesitate to contact our Data Protection Officer by emailing us at
privacy@twilio.com
or by writing to us at any of the following addresses:
Worldwide Headquarters
Twilio Inc.
101 Spear Street, 5th Floor
San Francisco CA 94105
EEA Headquarters
Twilio Ireland Limited
70 Sir John Rogerson's Quay
Dublin 2
D02 R296, Ireland
Complaints
We will endeavor to resolve questions, concerns or complaints you raise with us in accordance with our
Complaints Handling Procedure
. In the unlikely event that we are unable to resolve your concern, you can find information about your options to seek assistance through independent dispute resolution mechanisms or complaints to your local data protection authority
here
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Twilio commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States, the European Union, the United Kingdom, and/or Switzerland. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to you.
You have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance that are not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms. You can find more information in the DPF
ANNEX-I-introduction.
If your question or complaint relates to personal data we process as a data processor on behalf of a customer, we will direct you to contact our customer to address your question or complaint.
Changes to Our Privacy Notice
We will periodically review this Notice and may change it to address legal, technical or business development requirements or make clarifications. When we change this Notice, the most current version will be available at
https://www/twilio.com/legal/privacy
with the date indicating when it was last updated. If we make material changes that affect your rights, we will provide you with advance notice, such as by posting a message in the Twilio console or sending an email to the address we have on file for you. We will comply with applicable law with respect to any changes we make to this Notice. We will also seek your consent to material changes, where required by applicable law.
Twilio Product Privacy
Twilio offers a range of industry-leading communications and customer data platform services to our customers. Depending on the Service, Twilio may be a data controller and data processor of personal data used to provide the Services.
Twilio processes personal data (Communications Usage Data and Customer Content) for most of our Services as a data processor acting on the instruction of our customer and in accordance with the terms of our agreement with a customer, our
Data Protection Addendum
, and service specific terms. Our Services provide customers with ways to control, access and secure their data.
We also offer customers the ability to store, delete, access, or exercise other choices about their personal data. The ability to make these choices depends on the Service being used and how it is being used by a customer. Customers are referred to our
API docs
for each of our Services, along with SendGrid’s
documentation
and Segment’s
documentation
to find more detailed information about managing personal data collected and stored in connection with their use of our Services. We also provide an overview of our retention and deletion practices, including how to delete data you control in our
support documentation
. We provide information about the security measures we use to protect our customer’s data  in our
Security Overview
, and if you are located in a country that requires you to obtain information about our supplemental measures, you may read more about those measures
here
.
For some of the Services we also act as a data controller where disclosed and agreed to by our customer in the agreement, Data Protection Addendum, product specific terms or via the customers’ use and configuration of a product or feature.As a data controller, Twilio is responsible for the processing of the personal data.
For more detail on our Services, please find information below or by visiting our
products page
.
Authy
The Authy service is our standalone two-factor authentication (2FA) service for desktop and mobile. The Authy apps generate one time passwords and push notifications that can be used as a part of a two-step verification process with your Authy-compatible accounts to add another layer of security. Authy’s 2FA can be used on its own or with applications that directly integrate with Authy’s 2-factor authentication API.
Due to the nature of the Authy service, Twilio collects the following additional personal data elements to our other Services:
Identifiers
Once you open the Authy app, we ask you to provide us with a phone number to create your Authy account. We send a verification code to that phone number to be sure that the person creating the Authy account also has control over the phone number entered. This phone number is considered your “primary device,” and will be the identifier for your Authy account. We use that phone number to identify you, to provide you 2FA services, and to maintain logs for security and anti-fraud purposes. We also collect your email address, and we use it for identity verification and account recovery purposes.
Device Information
When you download and open the Authy desktop or mobile app, we automatically collect information about the type of device you have downloaded the app on and your device identifier. We collect this to ensure we deliver the right version of the app for your device and so that we can provide appropriate follow up support as necessary. We also use your device information to ensure proper delivery of our service and to provide and deliver support and maintenance of the Authy app.
Login History and Authy Account History
When you use an Authy token to log into an account, whether the token was generated on the app or one sent to you via your phone number, we collect and keep information associated with your login activity including information like your IP address, what application you logged in to, that you logged in, and when. If you change your phone number or email associated with your Authy account, we will also keep a log of that. We collect this information to monitor for suspicious activity and also as another piece of information that could be used to verify your identity if we suspect your account may be compromised.
Geolocation information
If you have location services turned on, we collect your location based on your IP address. We use this information for anti-fraud purposes, to check for suspicious activity and as another piece of information we can use to verify your identity if we suspect your account may be compromised.
Frontline Services
To use the Frontline services, you must log in to the Frontline app using a third party account (through your Single Sign-On provider). The authentication of your login details is handled by that third party and we only collect the information you expressly agree to share with us at the time you give permission to link the Frontline app with the third party account. We only gather the information you and our customers give us access to, and we only use it for the purposes for which you and our customers have provided it to us. Please see the
Frontline App Terms
for specific details about your relationship with us.
SendGrid Services
The SendGrid services also collect additional data in the form of web beacons placed in the body of emails delivered using the SendGrid platform. This allows us to keep track of whether or not an email has been delivered, opened, clicked on, whether it bounced or was treated as spam. You can learn more about web beacons in the section titled “
How We Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
” above.
Voice Intelligence
Voice Intelligence incorporates artificial intelligence and machine learning to transcribe and analyze voice calls into a structured format that allows our customers to drive their business processes. To translate voice calls into structured content, Twilio processes certain data as a controller, including personal data contained in voice calls disclosed to us by our customer through their use of the service.
Sub-policy 5
https://www.mindsethealth.com/legal/privacy-terms:
For individuals
Nerva for
Irritable bowel syndrome
Claria for
Mental health
Relio for
Chronic back pain
Evia for
Menopause
Finito for
Smoking cessation
Matter: blog & articles
Find a clinician
Back
Learn about
Hypnotherapy
Nerva for
Irritable bowel syndrome
Evia for
Menopause
For clinicians
Clinicians Overview
Nerva for Clinicians
Finito for Clinicians
Evia for Clinicians
Claria for Clinicians
Clinician Resources
Refer Patients with Connect
Nerva for IBS Clinicians Course
For health plans
Research
labs
About
Learn about Mindset Health
Contact us
Careers
Media & press kit
For individuals
Understand the science behind hypnotherapy and how it can help you.
For clinicians
Refer our programs to your patients and track their progress remotely.
For organizations
Promote team wellness with evidence-based hypnotherapy
Research
Discover the research our hypnotherapy programs are built on
About
Understand our mission, read our manifesto, meet the team and join us.
Back
Clinicians Overview
Nerva for Clinicians
Finito for Clinicians
Evia for Clinicians
Claria for Clinicians
Clinician Resources
Open Connect
Nerva for IBS Clinicians Course
Back
Nerva for
Irritable bowel syndrome
Claria for
Mental health
Relio for
Chronic back pain
Evia for
Menopause
Finito for
Smoking cessation
Matter: blog & articles
Find a clinician
Back
Learn about Mindset Health
Contact us
Careers
Media & press kit
Mindset Privacy Policy
‍
Mindset Health Pty Ltd (both together as “we”, "Mindset Health" and "Mindset") are committed to protecting and respecting your privacy. This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) (together with our Terms and any other documents referred to on it) sets out the basis on which any personal data we collect from you, or that you provide to us, will be processed by us and how you can get access to this information. If in doubt, the primary governing law of this policy is that of the state of Victoria, Australia.
1. Purpose of this Policy
Mindset Health provides you (the “User”) with access to the online and mobile services associated with Mindset, including but not limited to, mindsethealth.com and all associated subdomains (the “Website”), and the Mindset & Nerva mobile applications (the “App”), collectively the “System”.
Our privacy policy is written to be compliant with numerous national and international laws and frameworks, including (but not limited to)
HIPAA
,
GDPR
, and the
EU-US Privacy Shield
.
2. Processing your data
What is the purpose of our processing?
We process your data in order to provide program of personalized tools for managing mental health & wellness (and to support the delivery of that program).
What is our legal basis for processing?
We require consent from all users before processing their data. This consent can be
withdrawn
at any time. To request deletion of data, please send an email to hello@mindsethealth.com from the email associated with the data you wish to delete.
What data do we collect?
Personal information
We collect and use information like your name, email address, and phone number to personalize the course and communicate with you. You're able to opt out of any external communications (i.e., email and SMS message) at any time.
Health information
We collect information about your worry and anxiety (including, but not limited to, self-reported symptoms or difficulties associated with  worry, anxiety, mood, sleep, and stress) in order to personalize our program.
We may collect information about pre-existing medical conditions in order to ensure the safety of the worry and anxiety  management program we provide.
We also collect general information about your mental and physical wellbeing in order to evaluate progress against your self-defined goals.
Electronic identifiers
We may collection information about the devices you use to access the System, including (but not limited to) IP address, mobile device UDID and IMEI numbers, operating system, browser type, and screen size. This information is used to provide you with customer support, for system administration, to tailor your experience of the System, to report aggregate information internally, and to assist communication (e.g., push notifications).
Cookies
We may store cookies (small text files managed by your web browser) on your computer in order to improve your experience with the System. Example uses of these cookies include: recognizing you when you return to the System, maintaining data you've entered across multiple sessions, and storing information about your personal preferences.
You may refuse to accept cookies by changing the settings on your device to prevent cookies from being set. However, if you select this setting you may be unable to access certain parts of the System. Unless you have adjusted your browser setting so that it will refuse cookies, our system may issue cookies when you visit the System.
Non-identifiable information
We may include your data in aggregated data sets shared with our research partners. In these sets, your data is not personally identifiable, and would be used for supporting generalized statements (e.g., "women ages 35-40  working in non-office jobs have the highest levels of worry ").
3. Who has access to that data?
Mindset Health understands that your identifiable health information is private and personal and is dedicated to maintaining its confidentiality and integrity. As such, we will never sell or rent it, and we have policies, procedures, and other safeguards to help protect it from improper use and disclosure.
We follow a Minimum Necessary Access Policy so any required disclosure of your identifiable health information is minimized. The following categories describe the ways in which we use your identifiable health information and the rare instances that require us to disclose it to persons and entities outside of Big Health. We have not listed every use or disclosure within the categories below, but all permitted uses and disclosures will fall within one of the following categories. In addition, there are some uses and disclosures that may require your specific authorization.
Mindset Health does not disclose Personal Information to third parties for any purpose materially different from the purpose(s) for which it was originally collected.
Disclosure at your request
We may disclose information relating to your use of the System when requested by you. This disclosure at your request may require written authorization by you.
Payment
We do not store credit card or customer details with any 3rd parties except trusted suppliers who help us deliver the services associated with the System and we are committed to ensuring that all suppliers meet our security and data protection standards. As such, we may use and disclose your identifiable health information to obtain payment for services that we provide to you. For example, we may make disclosures to claim and obtain payment from your health insurer, HMO, or other company that arranges or pays the cost of some or all of your use of the System (“Your Payor”) or to verify that Your Payor will pay for health care.
Services and Operations
We may use and disclose your identifiable health information in connection with providing services, for our internal operations, which include administration, eligibility, planning, analytics and various activities that assess and improve the quality and cost effectiveness of the service that we deliver to you. Examples are using information about you to improve quality of the service, satisfaction surveys, de-identifying health information, customer services and internal training. To the extent you receive access to our Website and App through your employer or your health plan, our services may include supporting, and sharing information with, your employer’s wellness program, your health plan or third-party administrator or other similar programs. Possible information to be shared may include participation data (i.e. the fact that you used Mindset), milestone data (e.g. number of sessions you complete or how many times you practice the techniques) to allow you to earn incentives and rewards (if those are offered as part of your wellness program), as well as data from your initial self-report of worry and anxiety. Information that identifies you as an individual will not be shared with your employer.
Emails
We may receive a confirmation when you open an email from us, or click on a link in an email, if your computer supports this type of program. We use this confirmation to help us make emails more interesting and helpful. When you receive an email from us, you can opt out of receiving further emails by following the included instructions to unsubscribe. However, by opting out of further email communications after you sign up, you may limit program reminders and other valuable program content and components.
Reminders and notifications
We may use and disclose your identifiable health information to contact you as a reminder to interact with, or complete tasks relating to your use of the System. You may make changes to the format and frequency of these reminders, or cancel these reminders and/or notifications by logging into your Mindset account in the App, and/or by accessing the native notification settings on your mobile device when using the App.
Third party service providers
There are some services provided in our organization through third party services providers. Examples of third party services providers include accounting services, server hosting and email delivery providers, business associates, vendors and other business partners and reputable companies in the industry who subcontract to us or to those of your employer as our corporate customers, where permitted by law. We may disclose your identifiable health information to our third party services providers so that they can perform the job that is required of them. To protect your identifiable health information, we require appropriate contracts or written agreements be in place that safeguard your identifiable health information.
Third party medical professionals
With your explicit permission, we may share your identifiable health information with third party medical professionals nominated by you.
Threat to health or safety
We may use and disclose your identifiable health information when necessary to prevent a serious threat to your health and safety or the health and safety of the public or another person. Any disclosure, however, would only be to someone able to help prevent the threat.
As required by law
Certain laws permit or require certain uses and disclosures of identifiable health information for example, for public health activities, health oversight activities and law enforcement. In these instances, Mindset Health will only use or disclose your identifiable health information to the extent the law requires.
Personal representatives or persons involved with your care
We must use and disclose your identifiable health information to anyone who has the legal right to act for you (your personal representative) in order to administer your rights. We may also use or disclose your identifiable health information to a person involved in your care or who helps pay for your care, such as a family member, when you are incapacitated or in an emergency, or when you agree or fail to object when given the opportunity. If you are unavailable or unable to object, we will use our best judgment to decide if the disclosure is in your best interests. Special rules apply regarding when we may disclose health information to family members and others involved in a deceased individual's care. We may disclose health information to any persons involved, prior to the death, in the care or payment for care of a deceased individual, unless we are aware that doing so would be inconsistent with a preference previously expressed by the deceased.
For research and publicity purposes
We may use identifiable health information for internal and external research and publicity purposes. This may include publishing aggregate information about our users (for example, that women ages 35-40 working in non-office jobs have the highest levels of worry) in the context of providing public health information and conducting academic research. In certain instances, we may only provide such information with special waivers and permissions from you.
Transfer of business assets
In the event that we sell or buy any business or assets, in which case we may disclose your personal data to the prospective seller or buyer of such business or assets. If Mindset Health or substantially all of its assets are acquired by a third party, personal data held by it about its customers will be one of the transferred assets. Mindset Health will ensure that information transferred to third parties will only be used in a way that is compliant with Privacy Shield Principles, and will remain liable in cases of onward transfers to third parties.
‍
Mindset Terms of Service
This website (Site) is operated by Mindset Health Pty Ltd ABN: 11 617 368 957 (
we
, our or
us
).  It is available at www.mindsethealth.com/terms and may be available through other addresses or channels.
Consent:
By accessing and/or using our Site, you agree to these terms & conditions and our privacy policy on our site
(
Terms
). Please read these Terms carefully and immediately cease using our Site if you do not agree to them.
Variations:
We may, at any time and at our discretion, vary theseTerms by publishing the varied terms on our Site. We recommend you check ourSite regularly to ensure you are aware of our current terms. Materials andinformation on this Site (
Content
)are subject to change without notice. We do not undertake tokeep our Site up-to-date and we are not liable if any Content is inaccurate orout-of-date.
Licence to use our Site
: We grant you a non-exclusive,royalty-free, revocable, worldwide, non-transferable licence to use our Site inaccordance with these Terms.  All otheruses are prohibited without our prior written consent.
Prohibited conduct: You must not do orattempt to do anything: that is unlawful; prohibited by any laws applicable toour Site; which we would consider inappropriate; or which might bring us or ourSite into disrepute, including (without limitation):
(a)  anything that would constitute a breach of an individual’s privacy (including uploading private or personal information without an individual's consent) or any other legal rights;
(b)  using our Site to defame, harass, threaten, menace or offend any person;
(c)   interfering with any user using our Site;
(d)  tampering with or modifying our Site, knowingly transmitting viruses or other disabling features, or damaging or interfering with our Site, including (without limitation) using trojan horses, viruses or piracy or programming routines that may damage or interfere with our Site;
(e)  using our Site to send unsolicited email messages; or
(f)   facilitating or assisting a third party to do any of the above acts.
Exclusion of competitors
: You are prohibited from using our Site, including the Content, in any way that competes with our business.
‍
Information
: The Content is not comprehensive and is for general information purposes only.  It does not take into account your specific needs, objectives or circumstances, and it is not advice.  While we use reasonable attempts to ensure the accuracy and completeness of the Content, we make no representation or warranty in relation to it, to the maximum extent permitted by law.
IntellectualProperty rights:
Unless otherwise indicated, we own or licence all rights, title and interest (including intellectual property rights) in our Site and all of the Content. Your use of our Site and your use of and access to any Content does not grant or transfer to you any rights, title or interest in relation to our Site or the Content. You must not:
(a)       copy or use, in whole or in part, any Content;
(b)       reproduce, retransmit, distribute, disseminate, sell, publish, broadcast or circulate any Content to any third party; or
(c)        breach any intellectual property rights connected with our Site or the Content, including (without limitation) altering or modifying any of the Content, causing any of the Content to be framed or embedded in another website or platform, or creating derivative works from theContent.
User Content:
You may be permitted to post, upload, publish, submit or transmit relevant information and content (
User Content
)on our Site.  By making available anyUser Content on or through our Site, you grant to us a worldwide, irrevocable, perpetual, non-exclusive, transferable, royalty-free licence to use the UserContent, with the right to use, view, copy, adapt, modify, distribute, license, sell, transfer, communicate, publicly display, publicly perform, transmit, stream, broadcast, access, or otherwise exploit such User Content on, through or by means of our Site.
You agree that you are solely responsible for all User Content that you make available on or through our Site. You represent and warrant that:
(a)       you are either the sole and exclusive owner of all User Content or you have all rights, licences, consents and releases that are necessary to grant to us the rights in such User Content (as contemplated by these Terms); and
(b)       neither the User Content nor the posting, uploading, publication, submission or transmission of the User Content or our use of the User Content on, through or by means of our Site will infringe, misappropriate or violate a third party’s intellectual property rights, or rights of publicity or privacy, or result in the violation of any applicable law or regulation.
We do not endorse or approve, and are not responsible for, any User Content. We may, at any time (at our sole discretion), remove any User Content.
Third party sites
: Our Site may contain links to websites operated by third parties.  Unless expressly stated otherwise, we do not control, endorse or approve, and are not responsible for, the content on those websites. You should make your own investigations with respect to the suitability of those websites.
Discontinuance
: We may, at any time and without notice to you, discontinue our Site, in whole or in part. We may also exclude any person from using our Site, at any time and at our sole discretion. We are not responsible for any Liability you may suffer arising from or in connection with any such discontinuance or exclusion.
Warranties and disclaimers
: To the maximum extent permitted by law, we make no representations or warranties about our Site or the Content, including (without limitation) that:
(a)  they are complete, accurate, reliable, up-to-date and suitable for any particular purpose;
(b)  access will be uninterrupted, error-free or free from viruses; or
(c)   our Site will be secure.
You read, use and act on ourSite and the Content at your own risk.
Limitation of liability
: To the maximum extent permitted by law, we are not responsible for any loss, damage or expense, howsoever arising, whether direct or indirect and/or whether present, unascertained, future or contingent (
Liability
) suffered by you or any third party, arising from or in connection with your use of our Site and/or theContent and/or any inaccessibility of, interruption to or outage of our Site and/or any loss or corruption of data and/or the fact that the Content is incorrect, incomplete or out-of-date.
Indemnity
: To the maximum extent permitted by law, you must indemnify us, and hold us harmless, against any Liability suffered or incurred by us arising from or in connection with your use of our Site or any breach of these Terms or any applicable laws by you. This indemnity is a continuing obligation, independent from the other obligations under these Terms, and continues after these Terms end.  It is not necessary for us to suffer or incur any Liability before enforcing a right of indemnity under these Terms.
Termination
: These Terms are effective until terminated by us, which we may do at any time and without notice to you.  In the event of termination, all restrictions imposed on you by these Terms and limitations of liability set out in theseTerms will survive.
Disputes
: In the event of any dispute arising from, or in connection with, these Terms (
Dispute
),the party claiming there is a Dispute must give written notice to the other party setting out the details of the Dispute and proposing a resolution. Within7 days after receiving the notice, the parties must, by their senior executives or senior managers (who have the authority to reach a resolution on behalf of the party), meet at least once to attempt to resolve the Dispute or agree on the method of resolving the Dispute by other means, in good faith.  All aspects of every such conference, except the fact of the occurrence of the conference, will be privileged. If the parties do not resolve the Dispute, or (if the Dispute is not resolved) agree on an alternate method to resolve the Dispute, within 21 days after receipt of the notice, the Dispute may be referred by either party (by notice in writing to the other party) to litigation.
Severance
: If a provision of these Terms is held to be void, invalid, illegal or unenforceable, that provision must be read down as narrowly as necessary to allow it to be valid or enforceable. If it is not possible to read down a provision (in whole or in part), that provision (or that part of that provision) is severed from these Terms without affecting the validity or enforceability of the remainder of that provision or the other provisions in these Terms.
Jurisdiction
: Your use of our Site and these Terms are governed by the laws of Victoria, Australia. You irrevocably and unconditionally submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts operating in Victoria, Australia and any courts entitled to hear appeals from those courts and waive any right to object to proceedings being brought in those courts.
Our Site may be accessed throughout Australia and overseas.  We make no representation that our Site complies with the laws (including intellectual property laws) of any country outside Australia.  If you access our Site from outsideAustralia, you do so at your own risk and are responsible for complying with the laws of the jurisdiction where you access our Site.
For any questions and notices, please contact us at:
Mindset Health Pty Ltd 11 617 368 957
Email:
alex@mindsethealth.com
Sub-policy 6
https://www.mindsethealth.com/privacy-policy:
For individuals
Nerva for
Irritable bowel syndrome
Claria for
Mental health
Relio for
Chronic back pain
Evia for
Menopause
Finito for
Smoking cessation
Matter: blog & articles
Find a clinician
Back
Learn about
Hypnotherapy
Nerva for
Irritable bowel syndrome
Evia for
Menopause
For clinicians
Clinicians Overview
Nerva for Clinicians
Finito for Clinicians
Evia for Clinicians
Claria for Clinicians
Clinician Resources
Refer Patients with Connect
Nerva for IBS Clinicians Course
For health plans
Research
labs
About
Learn about Mindset Health
Contact us
Careers
Media & press kit
For individuals
Understand the science behind hypnotherapy and how it can help you.
For clinicians
Refer our programs to your patients and track their progress remotely.
For organizations
Promote team wellness with evidence-based hypnotherapy
Research
Discover the research our hypnotherapy programs are built on
About
Understand our mission, read our manifesto, meet the team and join us.
Back
Clinicians Overview
Nerva for Clinicians
Finito for Clinicians
Evia for Clinicians
Claria for Clinicians
Clinician Resources
Open Connect
Nerva for IBS Clinicians Course
Back
Nerva for
Irritable bowel syndrome
Claria for
Mental health
Relio for
Chronic back pain
Evia for
Menopause
Finito for
Smoking cessation
Matter: blog & articles
Find a clinician
Back
Learn about Mindset Health
Contact us
Careers
Media & press kit
Mindset Privacy Policy
‍
Mindset Health Pty Ltd (both together as “we”, "Mindset Health" and "Mindset") are committed to protecting and respecting your privacy. This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) (together with our Terms and any other documents referred to on it) sets out the basis on which any personal data we collect from you, or that you provide to us, will be processed by us and how you can get access to this information. If in doubt, the primary governing law of this policy is that of the state of Victoria, Australia.
1. Purpose of this Policy
Mindset Health provides you (the “User”) with access to the online and mobile services associated with Mindset, including but not limited to, mindsethealth.com and all associated subdomains (the “Website”), and the Mindset & Nerva mobile applications (the “App”), collectively the “System”.
Our privacy policy is written to be compliant with numerous national and international laws and frameworks, including (but not limited to)
HIPAA
,
GDPR
, and the
EU-US Privacy Shield
.
2. Processing your data
What is the purpose of our processing?
We process your data in order to provide program of personalized tools for managing mental health & wellness (and to support the delivery of that program).
What is our legal basis for processing?
We require consent from all users before processing their data. This consent can be
withdrawn
at any time. To request deletion of data, please send an email to hello@mindsethealth.com from the email associated with the data you wish to delete.
What data do we collect?
Personal information
We collect and use information like your name, email address, and phone number to personalize the course and communicate with you. You're able to opt out of any external communications (i.e., email and SMS message) at any time.
Health information
We collect information about your worry and anxiety (including, but not limited to, self-reported symptoms or difficulties associated with  worry, anxiety, mood, sleep, and stress) in order to personalize our program.
We may collect information about pre-existing medical conditions in order to ensure the safety of the worry and anxiety  management program we provide.
We also collect general information about your mental and physical wellbeing in order to evaluate progress against your self-defined goals.
Electronic identifiers
We may collection information about the devices you use to access the System, including (but not limited to) IP address, mobile device UDID and IMEI numbers, operating system, browser type, and screen size. This information is used to provide you with customer support, for system administration, to tailor your experience of the System, to report aggregate information internally, and to assist communication (e.g., push notifications).
Cookies
We may store cookies (small text files managed by your web browser) on your computer in order to improve your experience with the System. Example uses of these cookies include: recognizing you when you return to the System, maintaining data you've entered across multiple sessions, and storing information about your personal preferences.
You may refuse to accept cookies by changing the settings on your device to prevent cookies from being set. However, if you select this setting you may be unable to access certain parts of the System. Unless you have adjusted your browser setting so that it will refuse cookies, our system may issue cookies when you visit the System.
Non-identifiable information
We may include your data in aggregated data sets shared with our research partners. In these sets, your data is not personally identifiable, and would be used for supporting generalized statements (e.g., "women ages 35-40  working in non-office jobs have the highest levels of worry ").
3. Who has access to that data?
Mindset Health understands that your identifiable health information is private and personal and is dedicated to maintaining its confidentiality and integrity. As such, we will never sell or rent it, and we have policies, procedures, and other safeguards to help protect it from improper use and disclosure.
We follow a Minimum Necessary Access Policy so any required disclosure of your identifiable health information is minimized. The following categories describe the ways in which we use your identifiable health information and the rare instances that require us to disclose it to persons and entities outside of Big Health. We have not listed every use or disclosure within the categories below, but all permitted uses and disclosures will fall within one of the following categories. In addition, there are some uses and disclosures that may require your specific authorization.
Mindset Health does not disclose Personal Information to third parties for any purpose materially different from the purpose(s) for which it was originally collected.
Disclosure at your request
We may disclose information relating to your use of the System when requested by you. This disclosure at your request may require written authorization by you.
Payment
We do not store credit card or customer details with any 3rd parties except trusted suppliers who help us deliver the services associated with the System and we are committed to ensuring that all suppliers meet our security and data protection standards. As such, we may use and disclose your identifiable health information to obtain payment for services that we provide to you. For example, we may make disclosures to claim and obtain payment from your health insurer, HMO, or other company that arranges or pays the cost of some or all of your use of the System (“Your Payor”) or to verify that Your Payor will pay for health care.
Services and Operations
We may use and disclose your identifiable health information in connection with providing services, for our internal operations, which include administration, eligibility, planning, analytics and various activities that assess and improve the quality and cost effectiveness of the service that we deliver to you. Examples are using information about you to improve quality of the service, satisfaction surveys, de-identifying health information, customer services and internal training. To the extent you receive access to our Website and App through your employer or your health plan, our services may include supporting, and sharing information with, your employer’s wellness program, your health plan or third-party administrator or other similar programs. Possible information to be shared may include participation data (i.e. the fact that you used Mindset), milestone data (e.g. number of sessions you complete or how many times you practice the techniques) to allow you to earn incentives and rewards (if those are offered as part of your wellness program), as well as data from your initial self-report of worry and anxiety. Information that identifies you as an individual will not be shared with your employer.
Emails
We may receive a confirmation when you open an email from us, or click on a link in an email, if your computer supports this type of program. We use this confirmation to help us make emails more interesting and helpful. When you receive an email from us, you can opt out of receiving further emails by following the included instructions to unsubscribe. However, by opting out of further email communications after you sign up, you may limit program reminders and other valuable program content and components.
Reminders and notifications
We may use and disclose your identifiable health information to contact you as a reminder to interact with, or complete tasks relating to your use of the System. You may make changes to the format and frequency of these reminders, or cancel these reminders and/or notifications by logging into your Mindset account in the App, and/or by accessing the native notification settings on your mobile device when using the App.
Third party service providers
There are some services provided in our organization through third party services providers. Examples of third party services providers include accounting services, server hosting and email delivery providers, business associates, vendors and other business partners and reputable companies in the industry who subcontract to us or to those of your employer as our corporate customers, where permitted by law. We may disclose your identifiable health information to our third party services providers so that they can perform the job that is required of them. To protect your identifiable health information, we require appropriate contracts or written agreements be in place that safeguard your identifiable health information.
Third party medical professionals
With your explicit permission, we may share your identifiable health information with third party medical professionals nominated by you.
Threat to health or safety
We may use and disclose your identifiable health information when necessary to prevent a serious threat to your health and safety or the health and safety of the public or another person. Any disclosure, however, would only be to someone able to help prevent the threat.
As required by law
Certain laws permit or require certain uses and disclosures of identifiable health information for example, for public health activities, health oversight activities and law enforcement. In these instances, Mindset Health will only use or disclose your identifiable health information to the extent the law requires.
Personal representatives or persons involved with your care
We must use and disclose your identifiable health information to anyone who has the legal right to act for you (your personal representative) in order to administer your rights. We may also use or disclose your identifiable health information to a person involved in your care or who helps pay for your care, such as a family member, when you are incapacitated or in an emergency, or when you agree or fail to object when given the opportunity. If you are unavailable or unable to object, we will use our best judgment to decide if the disclosure is in your best interests. Special rules apply regarding when we may disclose health information to family members and others involved in a deceased individual's care. We may disclose health information to any persons involved, prior to the death, in the care or payment for care of a deceased individual, unless we are aware that doing so would be inconsistent with a preference previously expressed by the deceased.
For research and publicity purposes
We may use identifiable health information for internal and external research and publicity purposes. This may include publishing aggregate information about our users (for example, that women ages 35-40 working in non-office jobs have the highest levels of worry) in the context of providing public health information and conducting academic research. In certain instances, we may only provide such information with special waivers and permissions from you.
Transfer of business assets
In the event that we sell or buy any business or assets, in which case we may disclose your personal data to the prospective seller or buyer of such business or assets. If Mindset Health or substantially all of its assets are acquired by a third party, personal data held by it about its customers will be one of the transferred assets. Mindset Health will ensure that information transferred to third parties will only be used in a way that is compliant with Privacy Shield Principles, and will remain liable in cases of onward transfers to third parties.
‍
Mindset Terms of Service
This website (Site) is operated by Mindset Health Pty Ltd ABN: 11 617 368 957 (
we
, our or
us
).  It is available at www.mindsethealth.com/terms and may be available through other addresses or channels.
Consent:
By accessing and/or using our Site, you agree to these terms & conditions and our privacy policy on our site
(
Terms
). Please read these Terms carefully and immediately cease using our Site if you do not agree to them.
Variations:
We may, at any time and at our discretion, vary theseTerms by publishing the varied terms on our Site. We recommend you check ourSite regularly to ensure you are aware of our current terms. Materials andinformation on this Site (
Content
)are subject to change without notice. We do not undertake tokeep our Site up-to-date and we are not liable if any Content is inaccurate orout-of-date.
Licence to use our Site
: We grant you a non-exclusive,royalty-free, revocable, worldwide, non-transferable licence to use our Site inaccordance with these Terms.  All otheruses are prohibited without our prior written consent.
Prohibited conduct: You must not do orattempt to do anything: that is unlawful; prohibited by any laws applicable toour Site; which we would consider inappropriate; or which might bring us or ourSite into disrepute, including (without limitation):
(a)  anything that would constitute a breach of an individual’s privacy (including uploading private or personal information without an individual's consent) or any other legal rights;
(b)  using our Site to defame, harass, threaten, menace or offend any person;
(c)   interfering with any user using our Site;
(d)  tampering with or modifying our Site, knowingly transmitting viruses or other disabling features, or damaging or interfering with our Site, including (without limitation) using trojan horses, viruses or piracy or programming routines that may damage or interfere with our Site;
(e)  using our Site to send unsolicited email messages; or
(f)   facilitating or assisting a third party to do any of the above acts.
Exclusion of competitors
: You are prohibited from using our Site, including the Content, in any way that competes with our business.
‍
Information
: The Content is not comprehensive and is for general information purposes only.  It does not take into account your specific needs, objectives or circumstances, and it is not advice.  While we use reasonable attempts to ensure the accuracy and completeness of the Content, we make no representation or warranty in relation to it, to the maximum extent permitted by law.
IntellectualProperty rights:
Unless otherwise indicated, we own or licence all rights, title and interest (including intellectual property rights) in our Site and all of the Content. Your use of our Site and your use of and access to any Content does not grant or transfer to you any rights, title or interest in relation to our Site or the Content. You must not:
(a)       copy or use, in whole or in part, any Content;
(b)       reproduce, retransmit, distribute, disseminate, sell, publish, broadcast or circulate any Content to any third party; or
(c)        breach any intellectual property rights connected with our Site or the Content, including (without limitation) altering or modifying any of the Content, causing any of the Content to be framed or embedded in another website or platform, or creating derivative works from theContent.
User Content:
You may be permitted to post, upload, publish, submit or transmit relevant information and content (
User Content
)on our Site.  By making available anyUser Content on or through our Site, you grant to us a worldwide, irrevocable, perpetual, non-exclusive, transferable, royalty-free licence to use the UserContent, with the right to use, view, copy, adapt, modify, distribute, license, sell, transfer, communicate, publicly display, publicly perform, transmit, stream, broadcast, access, or otherwise exploit such User Content on, through or by means of our Site.
You agree that you are solely responsible for all User Content that you make available on or through our Site. You represent and warrant that:
(a)       you are either the sole and exclusive owner of all User Content or you have all rights, licences, consents and releases that are necessary to grant to us the rights in such User Content (as contemplated by these Terms); and
(b)       neither the User Content nor the posting, uploading, publication, submission or transmission of the User Content or our use of the User Content on, through or by means of our Site will infringe, misappropriate or violate a third party’s intellectual property rights, or rights of publicity or privacy, or result in the violation of any applicable law or regulation.
We do not endorse or approve, and are not responsible for, any User Content. We may, at any time (at our sole discretion), remove any User Content.
Third party sites
: Our Site may contain links to websites operated by third parties.  Unless expressly stated otherwise, we do not control, endorse or approve, and are not responsible for, the content on those websites. You should make your own investigations with respect to the suitability of those websites.
Discontinuance
: We may, at any time and without notice to you, discontinue our Site, in whole or in part. We may also exclude any person from using our Site, at any time and at our sole discretion. We are not responsible for any Liability you may suffer arising from or in connection with any such discontinuance or exclusion.
Warranties and disclaimers
: To the maximum extent permitted by law, we make no representations or warranties about our Site or the Content, including (without limitation) that:
(a)  they are complete, accurate, reliable, up-to-date and suitable for any particular purpose;
(b)  access will be uninterrupted, error-free or free from viruses; or
(c)   our Site will be secure.
You read, use and act on ourSite and the Content at your own risk.
Limitation of liability
: To the maximum extent permitted by law, we are not responsible for any loss, damage or expense, howsoever arising, whether direct or indirect and/or whether present, unascertained, future or contingent (
Liability
) suffered by you or any third party, arising from or in connection with your use of our Site and/or theContent and/or any inaccessibility of, interruption to or outage of our Site and/or any loss or corruption of data and/or the fact that the Content is incorrect, incomplete or out-of-date.
Indemnity
: To the maximum extent permitted by law, you must indemnify us, and hold us harmless, against any Liability suffered or incurred by us arising from or in connection with your use of our Site or any breach of these Terms or any applicable laws by you. This indemnity is a continuing obligation, independent from the other obligations under these Terms, and continues after these Terms end.  It is not necessary for us to suffer or incur any Liability before enforcing a right of indemnity under these Terms.
Termination
: These Terms are effective until terminated by us, which we may do at any time and without notice to you.  In the event of termination, all restrictions imposed on you by these Terms and limitations of liability set out in theseTerms will survive.
Disputes
: In the event of any dispute arising from, or in connection with, these Terms (
Dispute
),the party claiming there is a Dispute must give written notice to the other party setting out the details of the Dispute and proposing a resolution. Within7 days after receiving the notice, the parties must, by their senior executives or senior managers (who have the authority to reach a resolution on behalf of the party), meet at least once to attempt to resolve the Dispute or agree on the method of resolving the Dispute by other means, in good faith.  All aspects of every such conference, except the fact of the occurrence of the conference, will be privileged. If the parties do not resolve the Dispute, or (if the Dispute is not resolved) agree on an alternate method to resolve the Dispute, within 21 days after receipt of the notice, the Dispute may be referred by either party (by notice in writing to the other party) to litigation.
Severance
: If a provision of these Terms is held to be void, invalid, illegal or unenforceable, that provision must be read down as narrowly as necessary to allow it to be valid or enforceable. If it is not possible to read down a provision (in whole or in part), that provision (or that part of that provision) is severed from these Terms without affecting the validity or enforceability of the remainder of that provision or the other provisions in these Terms.
Jurisdiction
: Your use of our Site and these Terms are governed by the laws of Victoria, Australia. You irrevocably and unconditionally submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts operating in Victoria, Australia and any courts entitled to hear appeals from those courts and waive any right to object to proceedings being brought in those courts.
Our Site may be accessed throughout Australia and overseas.  We make no representation that our Site complies with the laws (including intellectual property laws) of any country outside Australia.  If you access our Site from outsideAustralia, you do so at your own risk and are responsible for complying with the laws of the jurisdiction where you access our Site.
For any questions and notices, please contact us at:
Mindset Health Pty Ltd 11 617 368 957
Email:
alex@mindsethealth.com